Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Subtitle 2. Incorporation

271B.2-010.
Incorporators.

One (1) or more persons may act as the incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by delivering articles of incorporation to the Secretary of State for filing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 15, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.2-020.
Articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation shall set forth:

A corporate name for the corporation that satisfies the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

;

The number of shares the corporation is authorized to issue;

The corporation’s initial registered office and initial registered agent that satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.4-010

;

The mailing address of the corporation’s principal office; and

The name and mailing address of each incorporator.

The articles of incorporation may set forth:

The names and mailing addresses of the individuals who are to serve as the initial directors;

Provisions not inconsistent with law regarding:

The purpose or purposes for which the corporation is organized;

Managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation;

Defining, limiting, and regulating the powers of the corporation, its board of directors, and shareholders;

A par value for authorized shares or classes of shares; and

The imposition of personal liability on shareholders for the debts of the corporation to a specified extent and upon specified conditions;

Any provision that under this chapter is required or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws; and

A provision eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a director to the corporation or its shareholders for monetary damages for breach of his duties as a director, provided that such provision shall not eliminate or limit the liability of a director:

For any transaction in which the director’s personal financial interest is in conflict with the financial interests of the corporation or its shareholders;

For acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve intentional misconduct or are known to the director to be a violation of law;

For any vote for or assent to an unlawful distribution to shareholders as prohibited under KRS

271B.8-330

; or

For any transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit.

No such provision shall eliminate or limit the liability of any director for any act or omission occurring prior to the date when such provision becomes effective. In no case shall this subsection or any such provision be construed to expand the liability of any director as determined pursuant to KRS

271B.8-300

.

The articles of incorporation need not set forth any of the corporate powers enumerated in this chapter.

In addition to the information otherwise required, the articles of incorporation for a public benefit corporation shall state:

That the corporation is a public benefit corporation; and

The purpose or purposes of the corporation, which shall include one (1) or more public benefits.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 16, effective January 1, 1989; 1988, ch. 224, § 7, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 341, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 151, § 52, effective January 1, 2011; 2017 ch. 28, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

271B.2-030.
Incorporation.

Unless a delayed effective date is specified, the corporate existence shall begin when the articles of incorporation are filed by the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State’s filing of the articles of incorporation shall be conclusive proof that the incorporators satisfied all conditions precedent to incorporation, except in a proceeding by the state to cancel or revoke the incorporation or involuntarily dissolve the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, §
17, effective January 1, 1989; 2007, ch. 137, §
53, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
53, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, Recent Amendments to Kentucky Business Entity Laws, Vol. 71, No. 5, Sept. 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 25.

271B.2-040.
Liability for preincorporation transactions.

All persons purporting to act as or on behalf of a corporation, knowing there was no incorporation under this chapter, shall be jointly and severally liable for all liabilities created while so acting.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 18, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.2-050.
Organization of corporation.

After incorporation:

If initial directors are named in the articles of incorporation, the initial directors shall hold an organizational meeting, at the call of a majority of the directors, to complete the organization of the corporation by appointing officers, adopting bylaws, and carrying on any other business brought before the meeting;

If initial directors are not named in the articles, the incorporator or incorporators shall hold an organizational meeting at the call of a majority of the incorporators:

To elect directors and complete the organization of the corporation; or

To elect a board of directors who shall complete the organization of the corporation.

Action required or permitted by this chapter to be taken by incorporators at an organizational meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action taken is evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action taken and signed by each incorporator.

An organizational meeting may be held in or out of this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, §
19, effective January 1, 1989; 2007, ch. 137, §
54, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
54, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

271B.2-060.
Bylaws.

The incorporators or board of directors of a corporation shall adopt initial bylaws for the corporation.

The bylaws of a corporation may contain any provision for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation that is not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 20, effective January 1, 1989.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Conflict of laws as to validity and effect of corporate bylaw. 27 A.L.R.2d 435.

Construction and effect of corporate articles, charter, or bylaws limiting duration or maturity of its indebtedness. 55 A.L.R.2d 949.

Construction and effect of corporate bylaws or articles relating to change in number of directors. 3 A.L.R.3d 623.

271B.2-070.
Emergency bylaws.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, the board of directors of a corporation may adopt bylaws to be effective only in an emergency defined in subsection (4) of this section. The emergency bylaws, which are subject to amendment or repeal by the shareholders, may make all provisions necessary for managing the corporation during the emergency, including:

Procedures for calling a meeting of the board of directors;

Quorum requirements for the meeting; and

Designation of additional or substitute directors.

All provisions of the regular bylaws consistent with the emergency bylaws remain effective during the emergency. The emergency bylaws are not effective after the emergency ends.

Corporate action taken in good faith in accordance with the emergency bylaws:

Shall bind the corporation; and

Shall not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee, or agent.

An emergency exists for purposes of this section if a quorum of the corporation’s directors cannot readily be assembled because of some catastrophic event.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, §
21, effective January 1, 1989; 2007, ch. 137, §
55, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
55, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).